Washington statutes.
RCW 35.107.050

Application approval by administrative official or committee of the city—When authorized.

(1) The duly authorized administrative official or committee of the city may approve the application if it finds that:

(a) The proposed qualifying project meets the criteria as defined by the city in RCW 35.107.030;

(b) The proposed qualifying project is or will be, at the time of completion, in conformance with all local plans and regulations that apply at the time the application is approved;

(c) The owner has complied with all standards and guidelines adopted by the city in RCW 35.107.030; and

(d) The site is located in a commercial office space development area that has been designated by the city legislative authority in accordance with the procedures and guidelines indicated in RCW 35.107.030.

(2) If the application is approved, the city must issue the owner of the property a conditional certificate of acceptance of the project for the sales and use tax remittance and participation in a property tax reinvestment program.

(3) If the application is denied by the authorized administrative official or committee authorized by the city legislative authority, the deciding administrative official or committee must state in writing the reasons for denial and send the notice to the applicant at the applicant's last known address within ten days of the denial.

(4) Upon denial by a duly authorized administrative official or committee, an applicant may appeal the denial to the city legislative authority within thirty days after receipt of the denial. The appeal before the governing authority must be based upon the record made before the administrative official or committee with the burden of proof on the applicant to show that there was no substantial evidence to support the administrative official's or committee's decision. The decision of the city legislative authority in denying or approving the application is final.

[ 2019 c 273 s 6.]